District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.01

Creation of the Excepted Service; qualifications; appointment; exclusivity of service.

The qualifications for each Excepted Service position shall be developed and issued by the appropriate personnel authority in consultation with the Mayor. Each employee appointed in the Excepted Service (except those included in § 1-609.08) must be well qualified for the position to which he or she is appointed. Each personnel authority may fill positions in the Excepted Service as provided in this subchapter. Excepted Service employees may be hired noncompetitively. Persons appointed to the Excepted Service are not in the Career, Educational, Executive, Management Supervisory or Legal Service.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 901, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(d), 46 DCR 1318
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 110(j), 47 DCR 520
Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-115, § 2(b), 59 DCR 461
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).
D.C. Law 19-115 substituted “must be well qualified” for “must meet the minimum standards prescribed”.
D.C. Law 13-91, in the fifth sentence, inserted “Executive,”.
1973 Ed., § 1-339.1.
1981 Ed., § 1-610.1.
This section is referenced in § 1-602.03, § 1-609.02, § 1-609.03, § 1-609.52, § 1-1161.01, § 6-623.02, and § 24-101a.
Taxicab commission, membership, see § 50-305.
Office of zoning, director serving as excepted service employee, see § 6-623.02.